Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-337.04
Clerk of district court; residency.

A clerk of the
district court elected after 2008 need not be a resident of the county when
he or she files for election as clerk of the district court, but a clerk of
the district court shall reside in a county for which he or she holds office.

Laws 2009, LB7, § 1.